Utah statutes.
34-38-7.   Employer's written testing policy -- Purposes and requirements for collection and testing -- Employer's use of test results.

(1)  Testing or retesting for the presence of drugs or alcohol by an employer shall be carried out within the terms of a written policy which has been distributed to employees and is available for review by prospective employees.

(2)  Within the terms of his written policy, an employer may require the collection and testing of samples for the following purposes:

(a)  investigation of possible individual employee impairment;

(b)  investigation of accidents in the workplace or incidents of workplace theft;

(c)  maintenance of safety for employees or the general public; or

(d)  maintenance of productivity, quality of products or services, or security of property or information.

(3)  The collection and testing of samples shall be conducted in accordance with Sections 34-38-4, 34-38-5, and 34-38-6, and need not be limited to circumstances where there are indications of individual, job-related impairment of an employee or prospective employee.

(4)  The employer's use and disposition of all drug or alcohol test results are subject to the limitations of Sections 34-38-8 and 34-38-13.

